it: Commercio e industria > Scienza e laboratorio > Prodotti biochimici: Buffer; Detergenti; Enzimi
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Tudomány és laboratórium > Biokémiai anyagok: Pufferek; Mosószerek; Enzimek
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 科学与实验 > 生化药品: 缓冲剂; 清洁剂; 酶
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Badania naukowe i laboratoryjne > Odczynniki biochemiczne: Bufory; Detergenty; Enzymy
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Wissenschaft & Labor > Biochemikalien: Puffer; Reinigungsmittel; Enzyme
sv: Företag och industri > Vetenskap och laboratorium > Biokemikalier: Buffertlösningar; Rengöringsmedel; Enzymer
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Věda a laboratoře > Biochemikálie: Pufrovací roztoky; Detergenty; Enzymy
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Khoa học & Phòng thí nghiệm > Hóa chất sinh hóa: Dung dịch đệm; Thuốc tẩy rửa; Enzim
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Tiede ja laboratorio > Biokemia: Puskurit; Pesuaineet; Entsyymit
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Επιστήμη & εργαστήριο > Βιοχημικά: Ρυθμιστικά διαλύματα; Απορρυπαντικά; Ένζυμα
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Znanost i laboratorij > Biokemikalije: Puferi; Deterdženti; Enzimi
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Vedecké laboratórium > Biochemikálie: Bufery; Čistiace prostriedky; Enzýmy
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Лабораторное и научное оборудование > Биохимические реагенты: Буферы; Детергенты; Ферменты
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 科学・実験 > 生化学: バッファー; 洗剤; 酵素
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Znanost in laboratorij > Biokemikalije: Pufri; Detergenti; Encimi
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Ciência e laboratório > Bioquímicos: Buffers; Detergentes; Enzimas
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 科學和實驗室 > 生化製品: 緩衝溶液; 洗滌劑; 酵素
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Bilim ve Laboratuvar > Biyokimyasallar: Tamponlar; Deterjanlar; Enzimler
en: Business & Industrial > Science & Laboratory > Biochemicals: Buffers; Detergents; Enzymes
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Ciência e laboratório > Bioquímica: Polidores; Detergentes; Enzimas
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Știință și laborator > Substanțe biochimice: Soluții tampon; Detergenți; Enzime
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > วิทยาศาสตร์และห้องแล็บ > เคมีชีวภาพ: บัฟเฟอร์; ผงซักฟอก; เอนไซม์
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 과학/연구 > 생화학제: 완충제; 세제; 효소
da: Erhverv og industri > Videnskab og laboratorier > Biokemikalier: Buffere; Rengøringsmidler; Enzymer
es: Economía e industria > Ciencia y laboratorio > Productos bioquímicos: Amortiguadores; Detergentes; Enzimas
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Wetenschap en laboratoriums > Biochemicaliën: Buffers; Detergenten; Enzymen
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Sciences et laboratoire > Éléments biochimiques: Tampons; Détergents; Enzymes
nb: Forretninger og industri > Vitenskap og laboratorier > Biokjemikalier: Poleringsskiver; Rensemidler; Enzymer
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Mokslas ir laboratorijos > Biocheminės medžiagos: Buferiai; Plovikliai; Fermentai
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Наука и лаборатория > Биохимикали: Буфери; Детергенти; Ензими